California, session 20252026, AB2328.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 20001 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:20001. (a) The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to a person, other than himself or herself, that driver, or in the death of a person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident and shall fulfill the requirements of Sections 20003 and 20004.(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), If the accident described in subdivision (a) results in injury, other than a permanent, serious injury, a person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(2) If the accident described in subdivision (a) results in death or permanent, serious injury, a person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years, or in a county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. However, the court, in the interests of justice and for reasons stated in the record, may reduce or eliminate the minimum imprisonment required by this paragraph.(3) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the accident described in subdivision (a) results in death, a person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for three, four, or five years, or in a county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year, and by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). However, the court, in the interests of justice and for reasons stated in the record, may reduce or eliminate the minimum imprisonment required by this paragraph.(3)(4) In imposing the minimum fine required by this subdivision, the court shall take into consideration the defendant’s ability to pay the fine and, in the interests of justice and for reasons stated in the record, may reduce the amount of that minimum fine to less than the amount otherwise required by this subdivision.(c) A person who flees the scene of the crime after committing a violation of Section 191.5 of, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, upon conviction of any of those sections, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed, shall be punished by an additional term of imprisonment of five years in the state prison. This additional term shall not be imposed unless the allegation is charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant or found to be true by the trier of fact. The court shall not strike a finding that brings a person within the provisions of this subdivision or an allegation made pursuant to this subdivision.(d) As used in this section, “permanent, serious injury” means the loss or permanent impairment of function of a bodily member or organ.SECTION 1.Section 4391 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4391.(a)On or before June 30, 2027, the Director of Health Care Services shall report to the Legislature on the effectiveness of the grant program and legislative recommendations for improving the effectiveness of the grant program.(b)(1)A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2)Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.